Hawaii, session 2025, SB1101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that one of the most popular traditional dishes to eat in the State is laulau.  Laulau is made from pork or fish wrapped in kalo and ti leaves and then steamed, traditionally in an underground oven known as an imu.  The preparation and consumption of laulau are cherished practices in Hawaiian communities, often shared at family gatherings, celebrations, and feasts, serving as a symbol of unity and cultural pride. The legislature further finds that the preservation and promotion of Hawaiian food traditions are essential to honoring the rich legacy of Native Hawaiian culture and fostering a deeper understanding of the cultural practices that have been passed down through generations.  The designation of a Laulau Day will provide an opportunity to celebrate and recognize this iconic dish, raise awareness of its cultural significance, and support local farmers, chefs, and communities who continue to keep these traditions alive. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to designate May 1 of each year as "Laulau Day" in the State. SECTION 2.  Chapter 8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§8-     Laulau Day.  May 1 of each year shall be known and designated as "Laulau Day".  This day is not and shall not be construed to be a state holiday." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________